Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-134.1 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Sections 4 through 7 of this act shall be known and may be cited
as the "Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative Act of 2026".


HB3647 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 250, O.S.L.
2022 (63 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1-132.1), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 1-132.1. A. There is hereby created the Office of the
State Coordinator for Health Information Exchange within the
Oklahoma Health Care Authority.
B. The Office shall have the power and duty to oversee:
1. Oversee the state-designated entity for health information
exchange, as described under Section 1-133 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title; and
2. Oversee the Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative.
C. The Office shall consist of the State Coordinator for Health
Information Exchange, who shall be appointed by and serve at the
pleasure of the Administrator of the Authority, and such other
employees of the Authority as the Administrator may assign to the
Office.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-133, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 243, O.S.L. 2024 (63 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1-133), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-133. A. As used in this section:
1. "Health information exchange" means the electronic movement
of health-related information among organizations according to
nationally recognized standards for purposes including, but not
limited to, payment, treatment, and administration; and
HB3647 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. "Health information exchange organization" means an entity
whose primary business activity is health information exchange and
which is governed by its stakeholders.
B. The State of Oklahoma:
1. Shall designate a health information exchange organization
as the state-designated entity for health information exchange;
2. Shall establish a transition plan to ensure continued
operation of the health information exchange; and
3. May temporarily serve as the state-designated entity as part
of the transition plan described in paragraph 2 of this subsection.
C. Beginning July 1, 2023, all 1. All health care providers as
defined by the rules promulgated by the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority Board and who are licensed by and located in this state
may report data to and utilize the state-designated entity. The
Office of the State Coordinator for Health Information Exchange
shall begin implementation of this requirement on or before July 1,
2026.
2. The Office of the State Coordinator for Health Information
Exchange may, as provided by rules promulgated by the Board, allow
exemptions from the requirement provided by paragraph 1 of this
subsection on the basis of:
a. financial hardship,
b. size of the practice, or
c. technological capability of a,
HB3647 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

d. type of health care provider, or
e. such other bases basis as may be provided by rules
promulgated by the Board.
D. 1. A person who participates in the services or information
provided by the state-designated entity shall not be liable in any
action for damages or costs of any nature that result solely from
the person's use or failure to use information or data from the
state-designated entity that was entered or retrieved under relevant
state or federal privacy laws, rules, regulations, or policies
including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996.
2. A person shall not be subject to antitrust or unfair
competition liability based on participation with the state-
designated entity as long as the participation provides an essential
governmental function for the public health and safety and enjoys
state action immunity.
E. A person who provides information and data to the state-
designated entity retains a property right in the information or
data, but grants to the other participants or subscribers a
nonexclusive license to retrieve and use that information or data
under relevant state or federal privacy laws, rules, regulations, or
policies including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

HB3647 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

F. Patient-specific protected health information shall only be
disclosed in compliance with relevant state or federal privacy laws,
rules, regulations, or policies including, but not limited to, the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.
G. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board shall promulgate
rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-134.2 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative Act
of 2026:
1. "Board" means the Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board;
2. "Claims data" means information included in an
institutional, professional, or pharmacy claim or equivalent
information transaction for a covered individual including the
amount paid to a provider of health care services plus any amount
owed by the covered individual;
3. "Covered individual" means a natural person who is a
resident of this state and is eligible to receive medical, dental,
or pharmaceutical benefits under any policy, contract, certificate,
evidence of coverage, rider, binder, or endorsement that provides
for or describes coverage;
4. "Direct personal identifiers" means information relating to
a covered individual that contains primary or obvious identifiers,
HB3647 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

such as the individual's name, street address, email address,
telephone number, or Social Security number. Direct personal
identifiers shall not include geographic or demographic information
that would allow the identification of a covered individual;
5. "Enrollment data" means demographic information and other
identifying information related to covered individuals, including
direct personal identifiers;
6. "Office" means the Office of the State Coordinator for
Health Information Exchange created under Section 1-132.1 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. "Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative" means an
initiative to create a database, including ongoing all-payer claims
database projects that receive and store data from a submitting
entity relating to medical, dental, pharmaceutical, and other
insurance claims information, unique identifiers, and geographic and
demographic information for covered individuals as permitted in the
Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative Act of 2026, and
provider files, for the purpose of implementing the Oklahoma Health
Care Transparency Initiative Act of 2026;
8. "Protected health information" means health information as
protected by the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act
of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191;
9. "Provider" means an individual or entity licensed by the
state to provide health care services;
HB3647 HFLR Page 7
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

10. "State-designated entity for health information exchange"
or "state-designated entity" means the health information exchange
organization designated by the State of Oklahoma as the state-
designated entity for health information exchange under Section 1-
133 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. a. "Submitting entity" means:
(1) an entity that provides health or dental
insurance or a health or dental benefit plan in
this state, including, but not limited to, an
insurance company, medical services plan, managed
care organization, hospital plan, hospital
medical service corporation, health maintenance
organization, or fraternal benefit society,
provided that the entity has covered individuals
and the entity had at least two thousand (2,000)
covered individuals in the previous calendar
year,
(2) a health benefit plan offered or administered by
or on behalf of the state or an agency or
instrumentality of the state, including, but not
limited to, benefits administered by a managed
care organization, notwithstanding the number of
covered individuals in the previous year,

HB3647 HFLR Page 8
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

(3) a health benefit plan offered or administered by
or on behalf of the federal government with the
agreement of the federal government,
(4) the Workers' Compensation Commission,
(5) any other entity providing a plan of health
insurance or health benefits subject to state
insurance regulation, or a third-party
administrator; provided, that the entity has
covered individuals and the entity had at least
two thousand (2,000) covered individuals in the
previous calendar year,
(6) a health benefit plan subject to the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, Pub. L.
No. 93-406, and that is fully insured,
(7) a risk-based provider organization licensed by
the Insurance Department, and
(8) any entity that contracts with the Department of
Corrections to provide medical, dental, or
pharmaceutical care to inmates.
b. A submitting entity shall not include:
(1) an entity that provides health insurance or a
health benefit plan that is accident-only,
specified disease, hospital indemnity, long-term

HB3647 HFLR Page 9
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

care, disability income, or other supplemental
benefit coverage,
(2) an employee of a welfare benefit plan as defined
by federal law that is also a trust established
pursuant to collective bargaining subject to the
Labor Management Relations Act of 1947, Pub. L.
No. 80-101,
(3) a health benefit plan subject to the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, Pub. L.
No. 93-406, that is self-funded,
(4) a Medicare supplemental policy as defined by 42
C.F.R., Section 403.205, or
(5) a pharmacy benefits manager; and
12. "Unique identifier" means any identifier that is guaranteed
to be unique among all identifiers for covered individuals but does
not include direct personal identifiers.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-134.3 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Beginning July 1, 2027, there is hereby created the Oklahoma
Health Care Transparency Initiative. The initiative shall be
governed by the state-designated entity for health information
exchange and overseen by the Office of the State Coordinator for
Health Information Exchange.
HB3647 HFLR Page 10
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. Beginning on a date determined by the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority Board, and thereafter in a frequency specified in rules
promulgated by the Board, a submitting entity shall submit claims
data, unique identifiers, and geographic and demographic information
for covered individuals as permitted in the Oklahoma Health Care
Transparency Initiative Act of 2026, and provider files to the
state-designated entity for health information exchange in
accordance with standards and procedures promulgated by the Board.
The Office shall begin implementation of the requirements of this
subsection on or before July 1, 2026.
C. 1. A health benefit plan, person, or entity excluded from
the definition of submitting entity as provided by Section 4 of this
act shall not be subject to the requirements of subsection B of this
section, but may voluntarily submit claims data, unique identifiers,
and geographic and demographic information for covered individuals
as permitted in the Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative Act
of 2026, and provider files to the state-designated entity in
accordance with standards and procedures promulgated by the Board.
2. To the extent the excluded health benefit plan, person, or
entity voluntarily submits data described in this subsection to the
state-designated entity, the health benefit plan, person, or entity
shall comply with all requirements of the Oklahoma Health Care
Transparency Initiative Act of 2026, other than subsection B of this

HB3647 HFLR Page 11
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

sect ion, including, but not limited to, compliance with applicable
state and federal data privacy and security laws.
D. 1. The State Department of Health shall submit all public
health data and vital statistics data collected by the Department
under Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes to the state-designated
entity for integration into the Oklahoma Health Care Transparency
Initiative database created under this section including, but not
limited to, data collected regarding hospital discharge and
emergency department records for the uninsured, birth and death
records, and disease registry data.
2. The data submitted under paragraph 1 of this subsection
shall be assigned a unique identifier and may be used in accordance
with the Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative Act of 2026
and the rules promulgated under the Oklahoma Health Care
Transparency Initiative Act of 2026.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-134.4 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Data and other information submitted under Section 5 of this
act shall be treated as confidential and shall be exempt from
disclosure as a record under the Oklahoma Open Records Act as
defined in Section 24A.3 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes and
are not subject to subpoena except to the extent provided in the
Oklahoma Insurance Code.
HB3647 HFLR Page 12
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. Data and other information submitted under Section 5 of this
act may only be collected, stored, used, disclosed, or released in
compliance with applicable state and federal data privacy and
security law, rules promulgated by the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority Board, and data governance policies established by the
state-designated entity for health information exchange.
C. Data and other information in the Oklahoma Health Care
Transparency Initiative shall, to the extent authorized by rules
promulgated by the Board, be available:
1. When disclosed in a form and manner that ensures the privacy
and security of protected health information as required by state
and federal laws, as a resource to insurers, employers, purchasers
of health care, researchers, state agencies, and health care
providers to allow for assessment of health care utilization,
expenditures, and performance in this state, including, but not
limited to, as a resource for hospital community health needs
assessments; and
2. To state programs regarding health care quality and costs
for use in improving health care in the state, subject to rules
prescribed by the Board conforming to state and federal privacy laws
or limiting access to limited-use data sets.
D. Data and other information in the Oklahoma Health Care
Transparency Initiative shall not be used to disclose trade secrets
of submitting entities.
HB3647 HFLR Page 13
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

E. Notwithstanding any other section of law, the Oklahoma
Health Care Transparency Initiative shall not publicly disclose any
data or other information that contains direct personal identifiers.
F. The Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative Act of 2026
shall not be construed to supersede, limit, amend, or abrogate any
data privacy or security law, rule, or policy.
SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-134.5 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except for state or federal agencies that are submitting
entities, a submitting entity that fails to submit data as required
by the Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative Act of 2026 or
the rules promulgated by the Oklahoma Health Care Authority Board
may be subject to a fine assessed by the Insurance Department.
B. The Insurance Commissioner shall adopt a schedule of fines
not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per day for each day
the violation occurs, to be determined by the severity of the
violation.
C. A fine assessed under this section may be remitted or
mitigated upon such terms and conditions as the Insurance
Commissioner considers proper and consistent with public health and
safety.
D. Of the proceeds from fines remitted under this section, the
Insurance Department shall retain a portion of such proceeds
HB3647 HFLR Page 14
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

nece ssary to cover the cost to the Department of administering the
assessment and collection of such fines, and the Department shall
remit the remainder of the proceeds to the Oklahoma Health Care
Authority. The Authority may only use proceeds from fines assessed
under this section to fund operations of the Oklahoma Health Care
Transparency Initiative.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 51 O.S. 2021, Section 24A.3, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 404, O.S.L. 2025 (51 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 24A.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 24A.3. As used in the Oklahoma Open Records Act:
1. "Record" means all documents including, but not limited to,
any book, paper, photograph, microfilm, data files created by or
used with computer software, computer tape, disk, record, sound
recording, film recording, video record or other material regardless
of physical form or characteristic, created by, received by, under
the authority of, or coming into the custody, control or possession
of public officials, public bodies or their representatives in
connection with the transaction of public business, the expenditure
of public funds or the administering of public property. Record
shall also mean applications and other documents related to
licensure matters that are filed of record in a district court,
including, but not limited to, marriage licenses, process server
licenses, closing out sale licenses, transient merchant licenses,

HB3647 HFLR Page 15
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

pool hall licenses, and bail bondsmen registration. Record does not
mean:
a. computer software, or
b. nongovernment personal effects, or
c. data or other information submitted to the state-
designated entity for information exchange under
Section 1-133 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes or
under the Oklahoma Health Care Transparency Initiative
Act of 2026;
2. "Public body" shall include, but not be limited to, any
office, department, board, bureau, commission, agency, trusteeship,
authority, council, committee, trust or any entity created by a
trust, county, city, village, town, township, district, school
district, fair board, court, executive office, advisory group, task
force, study group or any subdivision thereof, supported in whole or
in part by public funds or entrusted with the expenditure of public
funds or administering or operating public property, and all
committees, or subcommittees thereof. Except for the records
required by Section 24A.4 of this title, public body does not mean
judges, justices, the Council on Judicial Complaints, the
Legislature or legislators. Public body shall not include an
organization that is exempt from federal income tax under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and
whose sole beneficiary is a college or university, or an affiliated
HB3647 HFLR Page 16
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

enti ty of the college or university, that is a member of The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education. Such organization shall
not receive direct appropriations from the Legislature. The
following persons shall not be eligible to serve as a voting member
of the governing board of the organization:
a. a member, officer, or employee of the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education,
b. a member of the board of regents or other governing
board of the college or university that is the sole
beneficiary of the organization, or
c. an officer or employee of the college or university
that is the sole beneficiary of the organization;
3. "Public office" means the physical location where public
bodies conduct business or keep records;
4. "Public official" means any official or employee of any
public body as defined herein; and
5. "Law enforcement agency" means any public body charged with
enforcing state or local criminal laws and initiating criminal
prosecutions including, but not limited to: police departments;
state and local fire marshals when investigating potential
violations of federal, state, or local criminal laws or when acting
on behalf of a law enforcement agency; county sheriffs; the
Department of Public Safety; the Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics

HB3647 HFLR Page 17
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

and Dangerous Drugs Control; the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement
Commission; and the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation.
SECTION 9. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/25/2026 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.
















HB3647 HFLR Page 18
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.